Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-9,101
Multiple procedure payment reduction policy; implementation; when prohibited.

(1) For purposes of this section, multiple procedure payment reduction policy means a policy used in the federal medicare program under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act for outpatient rehabilitation service codes where full payment is made for the unit or procedure with the highest rate and subsequent units and procedures are paid at a reduction of the published rates when more than one unit procedure is provided to the same patient on the same day.

(2) A multiple procedure payment reduction policy shall not be implemented under the Medical Assistance Act as it applies to therapy services provided by physical therapy, occupational therapy, or speech-language pathology.

Laws 2021, LB100, § 2.